test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-kueqll_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - kueʹll e-stem: # Noun 'fish/kala' - full paradigm
     kueʹll+N+Sg+Nom: kueʹll
     kueʹll+N+Sg+Gen: kueʹl
     kueʹll+N+Sg+Acc: kueʹl
     kueʹll+N+Sg+Ill: kuâlˈla
     kueʹll+N+Sg+Loc: kueʹlest
     kueʹll+N+Sg+Com: [kuõʹlin, kueʹlin]
     kueʹll+N+Ess: kueʹllen
     kueʹll+N+Par: kueʹlled
     kueʹll+N+Sg+Abe: [kueʹltaa, kueʹltää]
     kueʹll+N+Pl+Nom: kueʹl
     kueʹll+N+Pl+Gen: [kuõʹli, kueʹli]
     kueʹll+N+Pl+Acc: [kuõʹlid, kueʹlid]
     kueʹll+N+Pl+Ill: [kuõʹlid, kueʹlid]
     kueʹll+N+Pl+Loc: [kuõʹlin, kueʹlin]
     kueʹll+N+Pl+Com: [kuõʹlivuiʹm, kueʹlivuiʹm]
     kueʹll+N+Pl+Abe: [kuõʹlitaa, kuõʹlitää, kueʹlitaa, kueʹlitää]
     kueʹll+N+Der/teʹm+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom: kueʹlteʹm
     kueʹll+N+Der/teʹm+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom: kueʹlteeʹm
     kueʹll+N+Der/teʹm+A+Attr: kueʹlteʹmes
     kueʹll+N+Der/t+A+Comp+Attr: kueʹltab
     kueʹll+N+Der/t+A+Der/umus+Superl+Attr: kueʹltumus
